                688 Attack Sub by Snuskbuske of H2O/Dual Crew
            

  Table of Contents:
  
  1. Welcome aboard
  1.1 About the Game
  1.2 Using this Manual
  2. Quick Start Guide to TORPEX' 89
  3. Missions
  4. Game Controls
  4.1 Configuring 688
  5. Submarine Controls
  5.1 Reading your displays
  5.2 Radio Room
  5.3 Navigation Room
  5.4 Ship's Control Panel
  5.5 Sonar Room
  5.6 Periscope
[1A  5.7 Weapons Control Panel
  5.8 Status Panel
  6. Submarine Warfare
  7. Technical Reference
  7.1 Submarines
  7.2 Weapons
  7.3 Ships
  7.4 Aircraft
  7.5 Glossary
  8. The Security Access Codes
  9. Keyboard Commands

  1. WELCOME ABOARD
  -----------------
  
      There are only two kinds of ships: Submarines and targets...

  You are hereby given command of a nuclear-powered attack submarine, the
  world's most powerful and versatile ocean-going defence weapon, You are now
  a hunter/killer, a predator of the deep. You play a silent, sometimes lethal
  game of hide and seek. Every minute you make countless decisions that may
  have grave consequences for you, your crew... even your country.
  
  1.1 ABOUT THE GAME
  ------------------
  
  You command an American Los Angeles or Soviet Alfa class submarine. You
  prowl throug a dark, undersea world, carrying out dangerous missions that
  require predatory cunning and bold action. In peacetime, you track and hunt
  potential enemies. In war, you ambush enemy convoys and defend your
  warships; stalk ballistic missile submarines and duel other hunter/killers
  strike at inland targets from enemy waters and live to tell about it.
  All the major systems of a modern attack submarine - sonar, weapons,
  navigation, helm, radio and periscope - are at your disposal. Over 40
  separate controls let you feel what it's like to operate the world's most
  sophisticated - and deadly - defence technology. At the same time, crew
  transmissions and pictures remind you that as captain you manage men as
  well as machines.
  688 Attack Sub turns the most up-to-date technical information available
  concerning subs into one of the hottest games on the market. You'll get
  hour's of pleasure from 688 Attack Sub's exciting graphics, fast pace,
  attention to detail and variety of player options.
  
  1.2 USING THIS MANUAL:
  ----------------------
  
  This manual was written for the Commodore Amiga computer. If you're using
  another type of computer, some commands and features described in this
  manual may be different or unanailable on your computer system. If you're
  using any computer other than an Amiga, please read the Command summary
  Card included in the package for information specific to your computer.
  The manual is both an introduction to the 688 Attack Sub simulation and a
  reference manual. It's divided into two parts so you don't have to read it
  all the way through in order to start playing.
  
  Chapters 1 - 2: Introduction to 688 - The first two chapters are designed
  to get you into the game quickly and painlessly. By no means do you have to
  read both chapters - if you're the type of player who doesn't like to read
  manuals, follow the step-by-step instructions in chapter 1 and you'll be
  ready to choose a mission and begin play. However, the fastest way to get
  your finger on the launch button is to let the Quick Start Guide in chapter
  2 lead you through the first mission, TORPEX' 89. By showing you how to set
  up an attack on several decommissioned warships, the Quick Start Guide will
  introduce you to the sub's controls and basic game concepts.
  
  Chapter 3 - 7: Captain's Reference - Refer to these chapters only when you
  need to know about something specific - missions, controls, tactics, or 
  ship and weapon specifictaions.
  
  Commanding 688 Attack Sub:
  --------------------------
  The 688 Attack Sub simulation is divided into levels. At the top level is
  the CONN (Conning Tower), the game's main menu. From the CONN you can go to
  Different stations. Each station is identified by it's own icon which
  appears as your cursor passes over the area.
  At each of the stations are controls for different parts of the sub. Some
  of the controls are clustered into control groups; for instance, the
  controls for the sound filter, active sonar and towed array make up the
  Sonar Control group.
  The stations and their controls are "hot spots", areas that perform
  functions. You give commands by moving the cursor to a hot spot and
  pressing <enter> or clicking a mouse button. There are two ways to move the
  cursor:
  Using a mouse: A mouse is by far the easiest way to play the game. Your
  cursor will change color and/or shape when it's over a hot spot. Click any
  button on your mouse to select that function.
  Using the keyboard: Move the cursor using the <tab> key and the arrow keys.
  Use <Tab> to tab through the different control groups; then user the right
  and left arrow keys to move the cursor between positions within a control
  group. The up and down arrow keys will move the cursor through all the
  controls regardless of their grouping (up moves the cursor to the left;
  down moves the cursor to the right).
  688 Attack Sub also has quick keys that instantly move your cursor to a
  station or a function. On every screen, each control group has been assigned
  a number - the number keys will move your cursor to the control groups you
  see onsreen. The function keys (<f2> - <f9>) take your cursor to the 
  submarine's stations. Within each station, different controls have been
  asssigned letter keys.
  For the game's keyboard interface, see the table on the back inside cover
  of this manual.
  In the rest of the manual, "select" means moving your cursor to a station
  or control and activating it by pressing <enter> or clicking the mouse
  button.
  
  Choose a Mission, Configure 688:
  --------------------------------
  Choose a mission (missions descriptions begins in chapter 3). Once you
  select a mission, the CONFIGURATION PANEL comes up. Set the sound, and play
  level. Select BEGIN GAME to start your mission.
  If you plan on using the Quick Start Guide to TORPEX' 89 in the next chapter:
  On the MISSION SELECTION screen, select 688 from the column next to
  TORPEX' 89. Once you've selected the TORPEX' 89 mission, the CONFIGURATION
  PANEL will come up. Make sure to set the CONFIGURATION PANEL as follows:
  
   1. Set the play level BEGINNER.
   
   2. Select BEGIN GAME to start playing. You start in the sub's CONN. Before
   you do anything else, you must enter a Security Access Keycode.0
   
  Enter the Secutity Access Keycode:
   
  You're in the sub's CONN. You can take your time: the game always pauses
  when you're in the CONN. Select the Radio Room by moving your cursor with
  the mouse or the <Tab> key until it changes into the Radio Room icon.
  Enter the Radio Room by pressing <enter> or any button on your mouse while
  the radion Room icon appears (you could also have pressed R or F2 to go to
  the Radio Room). You're given the name of a Los Angeles submarine and the
  beginning of a sentence. Starting in chapter 8, you'll find the names of
  Los Angeles class submarines. Find the name of the sub - they're in
  alphabetical order -. Find the sentence fragment you see onscreen, then
  enter the first three letters of the missing word.
  Use the arrow keys below the boxes to enter the letters. When you have the
  letters in the right sequence, select SEND CODE. If you've transmitted the
  correct security code, you will recive your mission orders. 688 Attack Sub
  will tell you if you've sent an invalid code and will put you back in the
  CONN. If this happends, go to the Radio Room to try again. You have as many
  tries as you want.
  
  QUTTING THE GAME:
  -----------------
  To quit the game, select EXIT from the CONN. You'll be given a choice of
  playing another mission, continuing your last mission, or exiting to
  Workbench. Select EXIT TO WORKBENCH.

  2. QUICK START GUIDE TO TROPEX' 89
  ----------------------------------

  As a quick start to 688 Attack Sub, we'll run through the first mission,
  TROPEX' 89. Playing the mission should acquaint you with most of the game
  controls and a few of the strategies. In TROPEX' 89, you're the captain of
  the Los Angeles (SSN 688) on a torpedo exercise in the Faeroe Island Chain.
  Your mission is to sink three decommissioned warships without being detected.
  During the exercise you'll give commands by moving the cursor to the sub's
  controls and clicking your mouse button or pressing <enter>.
  If the telephone rings or some other crisis comes up, you can put the game
  on pause by going to the CONN. When you're reading what to do next in the 
  exercise, go to the CONN so you won't lose valuable game time.

  1. Exit the Radio Room:
  -----------------------
  If you follow the instructions under Getting Started in chapter 1, you've
  already a) selected TORPEX' 89 from the MISSION SELECTION screen; b) 
  configured 688 to your computer on the CONFIGURATION PANEL; and c) entered
  in the Security Access Code and recived your mission orders. You should
  now be in the Radio Room of the Los Angeles. Go to the CONN by selecting
  EXIT in the top left-hand corner of the screen.

  2. Tour in the CONN:
  --------------------
  You are now in the submarine's CONN. This is the main menu of the game -
  from here you can go to any of the submarine's control stations. Explore
  for yourself, when you're done with the tour, select the Periscope icon.

  3. Go to the Periscope:
  -----------------------
  You are now at the Periscope station. Look at the map. You probably see a
  number of "X"s. These are sonar contacts that your sonar operator is picking
  up. At this point, he dosn't know what the contacts are or their, depth or
  speed. In this mission, you won't have to worry about unidentified contacts
  until your sonar operator can identify them. You'll be reciving sonar
  contacts and they can be anything from enemy subs to schools of fish. The
  ocean's filled with sounds - the only reliable sounds are the ones your 
  sonar operator can positively identify. (In combat, however, you might make
  more quesses.)
  Sonar is not the only way to get positive identification of a target - if
  it's a surface ship, you can view it with your periscope. Right now you're
  at periscope depth (20ft), so go to the PERISCOPE button and select it.
  Rotate the periscope until you see the destroyers. Select TARGET. A cross-
  haircursor will appear in the viewing window. Place the cursor on the
  closest ship and press <enter> or click the mouse button. Notice the target
  information that fills the bar at the top of the screen. Now take a look at
  the top-down map by selecting T on the 9-button map display control in the
  lower left corner of the screen. At least one of the "X"s should have turned
  into a letter. This means that you have a firm fix on the target's location.
  If you can't see the letter, the target may be outside the map area. Select
  O on the map display control until you get a bigger view of the map. While
  your periscope is still up, return to the CONN by selecting EXIT.

  4. Set a Viewpoint:
  -------------------
  While your periscope is giving you a firm fix on your targets, go to the
  Navigation Board so you can set the auto-pilot to steer your sub toward
  your targets. Select SET from the WAYPOINT CONTROL. A crosshair-cursor will
  appear on the map. Using the mouse or the cursor keys, move the crosshair
  to a point near your target. Press <enter> or the button on your mouse to
  select that point. A number will appear marking the waypoint.
  Now that you know the general direction you should be going, return to the
  Periscopr station and lower the periscope to avoid being detected by
  surface radar. You may immdiately lose the target information at the top
  of the screen. Don't worry about it. After your sonar man has listened for
  a few minutes, he'll get another fix on the target with his passive sonar.

  5. Set the throttle and depht:
  ------------------------------
  Even when the ship's auto-pilot is on, you're still in control of the speed 
  and depth of your sub. Go to the Ship's Control Panel by pressing <F4>. Set
  the THROTTLE on 2/3. Select 150 FT under AUTO FUNCTION. The crew will bring
  the sub to that depth. You could also have done this manually using the
  DIVE PLANE CONTROL.

  6. Load torpedos:
  -----------------
  Torpedoes are never stored armed and ready in a sub's torped tubes.
  Consequently, you must give an order to ready them. Go to the weapon Control
  Panel by pressing <F7>. Torpedo tube 1 should already be selected (the box
  around the number will be highlighted). Press R or 4 to move the cursor to
  the box and press <enter> or click a mouse button to arm and load the
  torpedo. Place your cursor on the next tube and press <enter> once to select
  the tube, then once more to arm the torpedo. Do this for all four torpedo
  tubes. The two auxiliary tubes hold noisemakers - don't bother loading them,
  you won't need them in this mission. The weapon's officer will inform you
  when each of the torpedoes is armed. The torpedo icons will also turn a
  darker color, indicating that they're ready to fire.

  7. Deploy Towed Array:
  ----------------------
  Now press <F8> to go to the Sonar Room. Select TOWED ARRAY. A towed array is
  a long cable with a series of microphones along its length. The towed array
  will improve your sonar operator's listening capabilities but will limit the
  sub's top speed.

  8. Compress Time:
  -----------------
  If your sonar man doesn't have a fix on the destroyers, you'll have to wait.
  This can take a few minutes. If you're impatient, go to the Navigation Board
  and select TIME under WAYPOINT CONTROLS. This speeds up the time. Keep your
  hand over the <enter> button. When your sonar man has a fix on one of the
  targets, deactivate the time compression by pressing <enter>.

  9. Target and Launch:
  ---------------------
  Go to the weapon Control Panel. If the ships are no longer targeted, select
  TARGET again and move the cursor on the map to the shipyou want to attack.
  If the range is under 10 miles (the maximum range of a 688 Attack Sub
  torpedo), you can go ahead and fire a torpedo. Check that the box around
  torpedo tube 1 is highlighted. If it isn't highlighted, selected it once.
  Now select LAUNCH. It will take more than one torpedo to sink a destroyer,
  so wait about 10 seconds, then select LAUNCH again. If you're still out of
  range (10 miles or more), you'll have to move in on the targets. This may
  require setting your engine on a higher speed.
  The sonar man will confirm if and when the torpedoes have reached their
  target. If you think it's worth the risk of detection (and in beginner mode,
  it probably is), you can go to periscope depth and raise your periscope to
  confirm a hit (the blood and guts brand of captain does this just to watch
  the flames rise). Fire torpedoes until the ship sinks (the letter will
  disappear from the map).

  10. Set up your attacks on the next ship:
  -----------------------------------------
  If you're lucky, you're already in range to strike your next target. If
  you're unlucky, you'll have to set up to nine different waypoints to attack
  the other two ships. Remember that you can set up to nine different 
  waypoints and your sub will go to each of them in numerical order.

  11. End of exercise:
  --------------------
  The exercise ends when you sink all three ships or after 15 minutes have
  gone by. This is when you receive warm praise or a sound verbal lashing
  from your superiors. Don't worry if you didn't do too well this first time
  around. Run through the exercise again - the controls will begin to become
  second nature and your performance will improve immediately.
  You've been introduced to most of the submarine's controls. There are only
  a few more that you haven't actually used.

  3. MISSIONS:
  ------------

  688's perilous missions try the true mettle of a submarine captain. There
  are 10 different missions set in the geographical powder kegs of the world's
  oceans. The missions progress chronologically from a cold war state of
  mutual distrust to total war. The challange of the erlier missions is one
  faced daily by submarine commanders; determining if a situation is
  threatening while trying to avoid ambiguous gestures that could lead to a
  shooting match with foreign submarines. (Of course, in 688 you're free to
  "resolve" conflicts in any way you like.) The later missions put the
  commander's abilities as a hunter/killer to the test.
  In general, the missions become more and more difficult - as the war heats
  up, each side becomes more and more merciless in their hunting.
  
  In each mission, the action unfolds within only a small portion of the full
  mission map. This "playfield" is usually an area of tactical interest to one
  or both sides. If a player wanders too far away from where the action is,
  the game will come to an end and a message from your CINC (Commander-In-
  Chief) will inform you that you missed the boat. The idea is to keep players
  from going off on wild goose chases where nothing will challange them.
  
  The following brief mission descriptions give you the necessary background
  information that you won't get from your onscreen mission orders. You can
  choose to command an American 688 or a Soviet Alfa. Both subs have their
  advantages and disadvantages, but neither sub's abilities outweigh the
  value of a cunning commander.
  
  TORPEX' 89:
  -----------
  
  688:
  Your superiors are going to look over your shoulder a few more times before
  they let you sail offf with a billion dollar sub. In this training exercise,
  you only have 15 minutes to sink three decommissioned Forrest Sherman class
  destroyers and prove that you're commander material. Your attack must come
  swiftly and silently. Navy helicopters will be attempting to locate your
  sub, so don't advertise your position with a lot of active sonar or by
  leaving your periscope out of the water for too long.
  Torpedoes: 22 Mark 48 ADCAP Torpedoes
  Missiles: 2 Submarine-Launched Harpoon Anti-Ship Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6
  
  700:
  You command the Dallas (SSN 700) in a joint training exercise with a Los
  Angeles. In this mission, you earn your commander's respect by beating your
  colleague to the draw. Sink three of the five de-commissioned warships to
  win the competition. Both subs are equipped with the above weapons.
  
  Shake 'Em:
  ----------
  
  688:
  American and Soviet naval forces sometimes practice ASW (Anti-Submarine
  Warfare) techniques on each other, rehearsing, as it were, for the real
  thing. The experience the crews gain and the information gathered on enemy
  tactics apparently make these high-tech games of superpower hide-and-seek
  worth the risk. In this mission, a Soviet sub is tracking you. The navy
  brass sees their own pride and budgets on the line, so the pressure's on
  you to shake this Russian sub. You must lose the Soviet sub for a period of
  at least 3 minutes in order to be declared successful - this means that the
  Alfa can't detect you as an "X". The mission will end once you've
  successfully evaded your oppenent for the 3 minutes or after the 20 minutes
  time limit is up.
  Torpedoes: 8 Mark 48 ADCAP Torpedoes
  Missiles: 4 Submarine-Launched Harpoon Anti-Ship Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6

  ALFA:
  As in every Navy, the only way up the ladder is by making your superiors
  notice you. Prove that American high-tech equipment is no match for soviet
  training and you'll make a big impression on the fleet admiral. Since you're
  practicing for real war, you must track the 688 in such a way that you'd be
  able to destroy him if this were a combat situation. This means you may not
  lose contact with the 688 for any period longer than 3 minutes (to keep
  "contact" on the 688, it must appear as an "X" or a letter on your map
  display). Don't lose contact on the 688 at the last minute or you lose.
  You must be close enough to the 688 that you could fire on him and easily
  hit him. Try and stay in the baffles of the 688 to stay undetected as long
  as possible.
  Torpedoes: 8 Type 53 Torpedoes
  Noisemakers: 4

  Sub Ops:
  --------

  ALFA:
  After a week-long operational test in the Barents Sea, you're ordered to
  execute routine ASW (Anti-Submarine Warfare) manoevres before returning to
  your home port of Severemorsk. Since imperialist submarines sometimes try
  to follow outbound Soviet subs as they leave home waters, you are given the
  job of "securing the port" - i.e., chasing off any intruders. If you use
  active sonar ("pinging"), enemy subs will know you're there and you'll
  scare them off. Be careful, though - spying subs may interpret pings from
  a long-distance as a prelude to a torpedo attack... at which point they may
  decide to actively defend themselves. Your best bet is to get as close as
  you can (under one mile) before you actively "ping" them. At very close
  range, the risk of being damaged by their own torpedoes is too great -
  they'll be forced to simply run away.
  Torpedoes: 18 Type 53 Torpedoes
  Noisemakers: 4

  Mumar Cadaver:
  --------------

  688:
  The White House is blaming the Libyans for recent acts of terrorism. To
  punish these "international criminals", a 688 is ordered to sink four Libyan
  oil tankers as they exit the Strait of Gibraltar. The tankers are under the
  protection of Libyan warships. Remember that the Strait is filled with
  traffic, so don't put the U.S in a bad light by sinking non-Libyan ships.
  Torpedoes: 20 Mark 48 ADCAP Torpedoes
  Missiles: 4 Submarine-Launched Harpoon Anti-Ship Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6

  Escape:
  -------

  688:
  Your crew is fatigued from month-long operations in the Mediterranean, so
  you're less than happy when your commander reports that there are Soviet
  submarines waiting to "accompany" you out of the Strait of Gibraltar. The
  Navy wants you to make a lasting impression on the Russians - you must pass
  through the western edge of the Strait undetected by Soviet subs.
  (The Soviets shouldn't have contact on you when you reach the Atlantic.)
  Torpedoes: 20 Mark 48 ADCAP Torpedoes
  Missiles: 4 Submarine-Launched Harpoon Anti-Ship Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6

  ALFA:
  While returning home from tour duty, your sub is suddenly ordered back to
  the Strait of Gibraltar where you'll wait to intercept an American attack
  sub. Intelligence sources observed a 688 in an Italian port and expect it
  to exit the Mediterranean soon. You keep contact on the 688 as it enters
  the Atlantic. Also, you must be at a range at which you could easily destroy
  the 688 if you had to. Try to be sly about this... ative sonar will not only
  make your presence known, it could be regarded as hostile action.
  Torpedoes: 18 Type 53 Torpedoes
  Noisemakers: 4

  Goulash:
  --------

  688:
  Under new leadership, Yugoslavia attempts to reform their economy and widen
  their autonomy. To do so, they have chosen a capitalist model and have asked
  for NATO's support. Perceiving a Yugoslavian alliance with NATO as a threat
  to themselves and the other Warsaw Pact nations, the Soviet invade
  Yugoslavia and attempt to set up a naval blockade. The U.S and Italy agree
  to provide Yugoslavia with covert military aid. A Los Angeles class
  submarine is assigned as escort to provide with a maximum protection with a
  minimum of exposure. Your job is to get six cargo ships north to Trivat
  before the rebellion is completely crushed. The Soviet warships have orders
  to sink first, ask questions later - if they get close enough, your cargo
  ships are history. You can try to lead the warships away, or you can make
  the seas safe for free trade by destroying the warships before they're in
  range of the cargo ships. The bottom line is; the cargo ships must get
  northeast safely.
  Torpedoes: 20 Mark 48 Torpedoes
  Missiles: 4 Submarine-Launched Harpoon Anti-Ship Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6

  Cat Walk:
  ---------

  688:
  Sparked by the Yugoslavian conflict, a limited war in Europe begins and
  quickly escalates into World War III. Your 688 has been assigned to patrol
  an area north of Japan - an important sea lane through which a number of
  Soviet SSBN's (nuclear-powered ballistic missile submarines) travel. A
  Soviet SSBN has reportedly left Vladivostok the day before and is entering
  your patrol sector. It may be under the protection of a Soviet attack
  submarine (SSN). Your main objective is to destroy the SSBN - think of any
  SSN's you encounter as dessert. Since slow-moving SSBN's can be extremly
  difficult to detect, a Seahawk helicopter will try to aid you in location
  it. If the helicopter finds the boomer, it'll drop a "marker" buoy in its
  vicinity. The marker buoy floats on the ocean surface and transmits a sonar
  "ping", informing you that it's over the general location of the SSBN. Your
  sonar officer will inform you when he detects a marker buoy. When you get the
  message, you should go to a depth of 150 ft or less so that you can target
  the marker buoy. Note the bearing and distance of your buoy: if you're too
  far away to launch torpedoes, make a course for the buoy; if the SSBN is
  close enough, launch torpedoes and direct them to the buoy's location, then
  set the torpedoes on a search program.
  Torpedoes: 20 Mark 48 Torpedoes
  Missiles: 4 Submarine-Launched Harpoon Anto-Ship Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6
  
  ALFA:
  Virtually all Soviet ships entering or leaving the main port of Vladivostok
  must traverse the Kunashir passage. This strategically critical "choke point"
  connecting the Sea of Japan with the Pacific is a likely place for an
  American attack on the outbound SSBN you've been ordered to protect. If it
  comes down to combat, don't confuse the SSBN with the 688. Make sure you
  know what you're firing on, because your torpedoes won't! The sonar analyser
  will help you distinguish contacts and keep you from firing on friendlines.
  Torpedoes: 18 Type 53 Torpedoes
  Noisemakers: 4
  
  Surprise Party:
  ---------------

  688:
  The war is heating up. NATO is sending a large battle group to the Norwegian
  Sea from the south in support of their current forces. The Norwegian Sea is
  of vital significance to both sides - it represent the only access the
  Soviet Northern Fleet has to the Atlantic Ocean. If NATO can keep the Soviet
  Northern Fleet "bottled up" in its home ports, American and European shipping
  can continue delivering preciously needed arms and supplies with minimum
  harassment. Your orders are to escort the reinforcements to the north and
  protect them from Soviet attack.
  Torpedoes: 20 Mark 48 Torpedoes
  Missiles: 4 Submarine-Launched Harpoon Anti-Ship Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6
  
  ALFA:
  Your orders are to patrol your sector and proceed to attack any enemy
  vessels you encounter. You stumble onto a large battle group and most
  single-handely engage the American ships. Good luck.
  Torpedoes: 18 Type 53 Torpedoes
  Noisemakers: 4
  
  Homecoming:
  -----------
  
  688:
  In order to keep the war effort rolling, America must keep the sea lanes to
  western Europe open. As in two previous world wars, American shipping forms
  convoys protected by warships. Your 688 is assigned to counter any naval
  assault an a convoy destined for France. In the event of an attack, you'll
  have to quickly perceive what the biggest threats to the convoy are and deal
  with them first.
  Torpedoes: 16 Mark 48 Torpedoes
  Missiles: 8 Sea Lance Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6
  
  ALFA:
  The Soviet Stavka realizes that it only has to cut off the American supplies
  to Europe and the war will come to an effective halt, perhaps resulting
  in total victory for the Soviets. The massive Soviet submarine force is sent
  to sea to cripple the U.S. Navy. This time, your Alfa and an Oscar class SSGN
  (nuclear-powered cruise missile submarine) wait in ambush for a NATO convoy.
  Torpedoes: 18 Type 53 Torpedoes
  Noisemakers: 6
  
  Hit and Run:
  ------------
  
  688:
  As the war between East and West escalates, the Navy decides that forward
  defence is the only way to force the Soviet to back off . Forward defence
  attempts to cripple or intimidate the enemy by attacking long-range targets
  behind enemy lines. The next step is to destroy inland targets - in this
  mission, you've been sent to the Baltic Sea to deliver a load of Tomahawk
  cruise missiles that will take out a Soviet nuclear weapons facilities.
  When the scenario begins, you're just off the coastof East Germany. One of
  the first things you should do is raise your periscope to confirm your
  location. Switch to top-down map by selecting T on the map diskplay control.
  Zoom out by selecting O until you see a letter on the top-down map. The
  letter is a pre-set waypoint for your Tomahawk missiles: this is the target
  you'll be firing your missiles at. (Cruise missiles such as the Tomahawk
  get their bearings by comparing computerized maps with the local terrain -
  what you're doing is providing the missile with its first landmark, which
  the missile will use as a reference point to guide itself to the target.)
  With your periscope still raised, select TARGET. You have only 5 minutes to
  fire ALL four missiles. Don't get too far away from the or you'll lose the
  targeted waypoint for the missiles. After you fire the missiles, you must
  rely on your own cunning to escape through the narrow, heavily patrolled
  passage out of the Baltic Sea.
  Torpedoes: 20 Mark 48 Torpedoes
  Missiles: 4 Submarine-Launched Tomahawk Crusie Missiles
  Noisemakers: 6
  
  4. GAME CONTROLS:
  -----------------
  
  4.1 Configuring 688 to Your Computer:
  -------------------------------------
  Once you've selected a mission, you can adjust the following on the
  Configuration Panel:
  Play Level: 688 Attack Sub comes with two play levels - BEGINNER and
  STANDARD. You can choose play levels only when you're playing against the
  computer.
    BEGINNER - Gives you certain advantages: you're quiter; your sonar is more
    powerful than your opponent's; your sub can take more damage; and your
    raised periscope isn't as noticeable by surface radar.
    STANDARD - You and your opponent have normal capabilities.
  EXIT: There are three ways to exit the Configuration Panel:
    BEGIN GAME - Begins the mission you selected on the Mission Selection
    screen.
    MISSION SELECTION - Returns you to the Mission Selection screen.
    EXIT TO WORKBENCH - Quits 688 Attack Sub altogether and returns you to
    WORKBENCH.
  
  Other Game Controls:
  --------------------
  Russian Script On/Off:
  ----------------------
  The Alfa's controls are in a pseudo-Cyrillic script to remind you that you're
  a Soviet officer fighting for world socialism. However, we relize that this
  attempt to add flavor may be distracting to some players, so we made it an
  optimal feature. To turn the pseudo-Cyrillic script off, go to the CONN and
  press <Ctrl>-R. To turn it back on, return to the CONN and press <Ctrl>-R
  again.
  
  5. SUBMARINE CONTROLS:
  ----------------------
  
  Most of the submarine controls are the same for both American and Soviet subs
  - they look different, and may be on different areas of the screen, but they
  do the same things. The older Soviet Alfa class sub is missing some high-tech
  equipment, such as the contour imaging display; any exceptions pertaining to
  the Alfa are noted in the descriptions.
  
  5.1 Reading Your Displays:
  --------------------------
  As an attack boat, your primary role is to stalk enemy vessels. To
  successfully do this, you must constantly be aware of your position and
  course relative to those of your target(s). Since in a submarine you can't
  actually see anything around you, you can orient yourself with the aid of
  top-down maps and the contour imaging display.
  Top-down maps are available at all stations except in the Radio Room - where
  only your location and target information are at hand - and at the Status
  Panel. Contour imaging is available at all stations except the Radio Room,
  Status Panel and Periscope. At the Periscope, the map window becomes your
  periscope view when you raise the periscope. (Note: the Alfa isn't equipped
  with contour imaging.)

  Top-down Map:
  -------------
  The top-down map gives you aerial perspectives of the area your submarine is
  travesing and displays information collected by your sonar and periscope. The
  area can be viewed from ten different ranges using the zoom feature. On the
  688, select I and O from the Map Display Controls to zoom in and out. To zoom
  in and out on the map aboard the Alfa, select DN and UP. Selecting the zoom
  buttons repeatedly moves you quickly through the magnifications. Your
  submarine is the fixed point in the center of the screen (except at some of
  the highest zoom levels). Other information on your map include:
  
  Ocean Depths:
  -------------
  Different shades on your map designate different depths. The darker the
  shade, the deeper the water. Depth can vary from 0 to greater than 2000 ft
  (since very few submarines can actually dive belowe 2000 ft, the exact
  depth of really deep ocean doesn't matter). Always stay aware of the average
  depth of the water you're sailing through (see Heads-Up-Display below). It's
  possible to run aground - somewhat embarrassing for a submarine commander.
  To cross the shallowest waters (the lightest colour on your top-down map),
  you'll have to surface.
  
  Sonar Contacts (letters):
  -------------------------
  When you first recive a sonar contact, the ship's computer displays the
  contact as an "X". An "X" means that you only know what direction the sound
  came from. The target's range, speed and depth are still a mystery. An "X"
  always appears halfway between you and the edge of the display regardless
  of the zoom level. When your sonar operator gets a fix on a target, it's
  assigned a letter so you can keep track of it. Letters always mark the exact
  location of a target. The sonar operator still may not know exactly what
  the target is. If he doesn't, UNKNOWN SURFACE CONTACT or UNKNOWN SUBMERGED
  CONTACT will be displayed in the target information bar and the target's
  letter will appear dark. When the sonar operator positively identifies the
  target, the letter will turn a lighter shade. If a contact is lost and
  regained, it may be assigned a new letter.

  Waypoints (numbers):
  --------------------
  Waypoints (destinations) that you've set are displayed on the map as numbers

  Countour Imaging Display:
  -------------------------
  In 688 Attack Sub, the Los Angeles is equipped with a device called a "side
  scanning sonar" that produces a contour image of the ocean floor. This is
  useful when traveling near the ocean floor. A sophisticated, high-frequence
  sonar beam scans the ocean terrain around the bow, port and starboard of the
  submarine. The beam's high-frequence and short range make it virtually
  undetectable by other ship's arrays - there are no penalties for using the
  contour imaging system. With the sonar information, a computer generates an
  image of the ocean terrain around the sub. Oval shapes designate sonar
  contacts. The larger the oval, the closer it is to your sub. The ovals are
  assigned letters, too, which always correspond with the lettes displayed on
  the top-down map.
  To turn on the contour imaging display, select C from the map display control
  on the left side of the screen. Use P, F and S to look to port, forward and
  to starboard. (Note: the Alfa isn't equipped with contour imaging.)

  Heads-Up-Display (HUD):
  -----------------------
  The HUD is an overlay on the map that lets you quickly refer to your sub's
  course and depth. A compass is displayed along the top of your view screen.
  The white triangle in the middle of the line is your sub's current course.
  The vertical gauge along the right side of the view screen shows your depth
  relative to the ocean floor. The top marker on the left side of the gauge
  is your sub's current depth.
  The bottom marker is the depth of the ocean directly below you. Thermal
  layers are marked by longer lines on the right side of the depth gauge.
  Always stay aware of how close you are to the ocean floor - keep a safe
  distance between you and the bottom marker or you may end up with a ruptured
  hull. In the top left hand corner, the HUD will also tell you what direction
  your periscope is currently pointing.
  When you first boot the game, the HUD will be activated, If it's in the way
  of a target you're viewinhg, you can turn the HUD on and off by selecting
  H from the 9-button map display control of the 688. On the Alfa, select
  HUD to turn the display on and off.

  Map Display Control:
  --------------------
  The 688 has contour imaging, and the Alfa doesn't. Consequently, the 688
  has more map controls then the Alfa.

  688 Map Display Control:
  ------------------------
  Port - lock to port contour imaging or periscope view.
  Forward - Look forward in contour imaging or periscope view.
  Starboard - Look to starboard in contour imaging or periscope view.
  In - Zoom in on top-down map.
  Heads-up-display - HUD on/off.
  Out - Zoom out from top-down map.
  Contour imaging display - Turn contour imaging on.
  Bottom - Bottom contours on/off (top-down map only).
  Top-down map - Turn top-down map on.

  Alfa Map Display Control:
  -------------------------
  UP - Zoom out on top-down map.
  DN - Zoom in on top-down map.
  CONTOUR - Bottom contours on/off.
  HUD - Heads-Up Display on/off.

  Target Information:
  -------------------
  In the box at the top of the screen is the target information:
  In a typical combat situation, your map will be showing several sonar
  contacts. Some may have been identified; others may still be undetermined.
  Choose the TARGET command to find out what your sonar operator has
  determined about the various objects in the water. The things the sonar
  operator is trying to determine are:

  TARGET: What the target is. If the sonar operator doesn't know yet, "UNKNOWN
  CONTACT" will appear here. Sometimes the sonar operator will know wheter the
  contact is on the surface or submerged - in this case, "UNKNOWN SURFACE
  CONTACT" or "UNKNOWN SUBMERGED CONTACT" will appear here.

  BEARING: Where the target is in relation to your submarine. It is important
  to understand the difference between bearing and course. In determining a
  ship's course, the northern point of the compass is the reference point
  (000o is North; 180o is south; etc.). In determining your target's bearing,
  your submarine is the reference point. Your bow (the tip of your ship) is
  000o; the location of all other vessels in the water are reckoned from this
  point. Moving clockwise, 090o is to your right (starboard); 180o is behind
  you (stern); and 270o is to your left (port).

  RANGE: How far wway the target is from your ship. This is measured in
  nautical miles (nm).
  COURSE: What direction on teh compass the target is headed. When reckoning
  course, North is 000o.
  SPEED: How fast the target is going. This is measurred in knots.
  DEPTH: How deep the target is. This is measured in feet.

  Information Bar:
  ----------------
  The crew reports to you from time to time to tell you when something has
  happened. Crew reports and messages run from right to left along the
  information bar directly below the station's controls. If for some reason a
  message has to be repeted, the message will not scroll from right to left -
  instead, an audible "click" will tell you that the message currently in the
  information bar is being repeted. Long strings of messages may interrupt your
  game. You can make messages go by faster by pressing SPACEBAR.
  
  Location and Time:
  ------------------
  On the information bar at the base of the screen are your sub's current map
  coordinates. To the right of these is the number of minutes that have elapsed
  during your current mission. Mission time runs twice as fast as real time
  when time compression is activated (this is a rough approximation: the exact
  ratio depends on the speed of your computer).
  
  5.2 Radio Room:
  ---------------
  All missions begin and end in the Radio Room where you receive your CINC's
  warm praise or cold shoulder. However, this isn't the only function of the
  Radio Room...
  
  EXIT - Returns you to the CONN.
  
  PERISCOPE - Raise or lowers your periscope. You must be at periscope depth
              (20 ft) to raise your periscope.

  ANTENNA - Raise or lowers your antenna. You must be at periscope depth
            (20 ft) to raise your antenna.

  Message Review:
  ---------------
  If messages from the crew are rolling by too quickly and you think you
  missed something critical, you can review the messages in the radio room.
  Select PREV to review the previous recorded message. It will appear in
  the message bar, only darker than the current messages coming from your
  crew. NEXT will scroll you forward through the recorded messages until you
  come to the latest message.
  
  Transmit:
  ---------
  If you forgot your mission objectives, you can review your mission orders
  during the mission by selcting TRANSMIT and typing MISSION. You must be
  at periscope depth and your antenna must be up.
  
  5.3 Navigation Board:
  ---------------------
  EXIT - Returns you too the CONN.

  Plotting:
  ---------
  ALL TRACKS - Select this to view the tracks of all targets displayed on the
  screen. The tracks appear as small dots. The closer the dots are to each
  other, the slower the target is moving. All tracks will be black execpt the
  track of the current target, which will appear as a lighter colour.
  
  TARGET TRACK - Display the target's targets only.
  
  PLOT PROJECTION - Select this to see where you and a target will be in a
  given amount of time assuming you both maintain your present course and
  speed. You have to use this in conjunction with the TIME PROJECTION feature.
  Enter the number of minutes you want to projext into the TIME PROJECTION
  slots. Now select PLOT PROJECTION. A lighter marker will show you what your
  position will be in the selected amount of time if you maintain your present
  speed and course. A dark marker will show the currently selected target's
  projected position. You can now direct torpedoes to go to the projected
  point.
  
  TIME PROJECTION - See PLOT PROJECTION above.
  
  Waypoint Control:
  -----------------
  A waypoint is a destination for your sub. Selecting waypoints activates the
  auto-pilot, which will steer your sub to each of the waypoint in the order
  you selected them. The auto-pilot won't set your speed for you, it will
  adjust the speed down to make turns efficiently and quitly. After making
  the turn, the auto-pilot will return to the previously set speed. (Note:
  the auto-pilot is programmed not to return to FLANK speed - if you were at
  FLANK speed and you make a turn, the auto-pilot will only return you to
  FULL.) The auto-pilot won't control your depth, either, so make sure you're
  not too close to the ocean floor. A waypoint is cleared only when you've
  reached it or when you've selected CLEAR.
  
  SET - You can only set waypoints while viewing the top-down map. When you
  select this command, a crosshair-cursor will appear in the viewing window.
  Move the cursor to where you want your sub to go and press <enter> or any
  mouse button. A number will appear on your map marking the waypoint. You
  may select up to nine waypoints. The ship's auto-pilot will guide the sub
  to each waypoint in numerical order.
  lis
  CLEAR - Erases the last waypoint you set.
  
  TIME - Turns on the time compression feature, making game time go by twice
  as fast (this is rough approximation: the exact ratio depebds on the speed
  of your computer). Use this to speed up the game during longer transits.
  Press <enter> to return to normal time.
  
  AUTO-PILOT - Turns the auto-pilot on or off. The auto-pilot will only
  function if you have set at least one waypoint. Changing the rudder will
  automatically turn off the auto-pilot, Changing your depth ar speed won't
  effect the auto-pilot. (Note: that the auto-pilot is oblivious to the ocean
  depth. It won't take you to a higher depth if you're about to smash into the
  bottom of the ocean.) If something comes up and you have to change your
  course manually using the rudder (thus turning your auto-pilot off), you
  can always head back to a waypoint as long as it's still set. Simply turn
  the auto-pilot back on.

  TARGET - When you select this, a crosshair-cursor will appear on the viewing
  window. Move the crosshair-cursor with the TAB key or mouse to the target
  (typing the letter of a target will also move the crosshair-cursor). As you
  move the cursor to each of the targets on the screen, all available
  information on the target appears in the TARGET INFORMATION box at the top
  of the screen. Select a target by pressing <enter> or clicking a mouse
  button. Launched torpedoes will head for whichever target is currently
  selected. Once the torpedoes are launched, however, you are free to target
  any other contacts in the water.

  5.4 Ship's Control Panel:
  -------------------------
  EXIT - Returns you to the CONN.

  Cavitation Level Gauge:
  -----------------------
  This gauge monitors the noise produced by cavitation. Cavitation results
  from partial vacuums that form around the propellor blades when the propellor
  is moving faster than the water around it can follow. Since the bubbles
  produced by cavitation are very noisy, you want to avoid it as if it were
  death itself. Two factors are involved here: acceleration and depth. Quick
  acceleration causes your propeller to spin faster than normal, which spells
  more noise. Depth effects the cavitation level, too. Since water pressure
  increases with depth, partial vacuums don't form as readily around your
  propellers the farther down you go. You can avoid high cavitation levels by
  not setting your speed at FLANK or REVERSE.

  Dive Plane Control:
  -------------------
  Controls the rate at which you dive and surface. Lowering the handle
  releases air from the ballast tanks, filling the tanks with seawater and
  causing the sub to dive.Raising the handle releases compressed air into
  the ballast tanks which blows out the water and causes the sub to rise. How
  far you lower or raise the handle determines how fast you dive or rise - for
  instance, raising the handle a few degrees will cause the sub to rise very
  gradually, while raising the handle all the way will cause the sub to rise
  quickly.

  Auto functions:
  ---------------
  Use the auto functions so you can order the crew to change your depth
  without having to monitor the dive plane.

  150 FT - Brings you to a depth of 150 ft.

  PERISCOPE DEPTH - Brings you to periscope depth (20 ft).

  EMERGENCY SURFACE - Brings you to the surface at maximum rate. This can
  be quite noisy. Do as it says and only use this in emergencies.

  AUTO-PILOT - See AUTO-PILOT, above

  ENGINE CONTROL - Set your speed with the engine control or throttle. The
  numbers represent fractions or percentages of your total power output. You
  can't go to STD (standard), FULL or FLANK at depths of 100 ft or less
  because you'd be making far too much noise for your own good. Use FLANK
  speed to accelerate quickly, but remember that higher speeds have their
  penalties - not only do you become more audible to enemy sonar at high
  speeds, you can't hear as much over your own engines and the water flowing
  over your hydrophones. Part of the real art of submarining is knowing
  when you should use high speeds and when you should cut your engines
  completely. REV (reverse) will slow you down quickly but is extremely noisy
  (the sub's propellor is spinning opposite its normal direction, which
  produces a lot of cavitation, especially between 0 and 100 ft.

  RUDDER - The rudder changes the ship's course provided you're moving
  forward. The control is incremented so you can control the rate at which
  you change course. The farther you move the handle to the left or right,
  the "harder" (i.e., more severe) the turn. Remember that activating the
  rudder will turn off the auto-pilot.

  5.5 Sonar Room:
  ---------------
  EXIT - Returns you to the CONN.

  Sonar Computer:
  ---------------
  ANALYSE - All ships, submarines, torpedoes and marine life make distinctive
  sounds. Each of these sounds has a sound "signature" or frequency pattern
  that distinguishes it from other sounds. Use the frequency analyser to
  display the sound signature of your current target. The horizontal line of
  the gauge represents the audible frequence spectrum (left being the low
  frequency end and right being the high frequency end). The vertical line
  represents the degree of sound received in that part of the frequency
  spectrum. Different objects will "peak" in different parts of the spectrum.
  As you can see, ships tend to make more noise in the low end of the
  frequenct spectrum; torpedoes in the higher end. Keep in mind that the above
  diagram is only a rough approximation - there are exceptions. To get
  positive identification, you must be able to recognize the individual
  sound signature of an object. This takes experience. Remember, it can be
  well worth your while to know the signatures of torpedoes and enemy subs
  when you're surrounded by "unknown contacts" and you need to act fast!

  Sonar Controls:
  ---------------
  FILTER - Sound waves travel at many frequencies in the ocean. Generally
  you'll want to have the filter set on BAND PASS so you can monitor all of
  them. However, in critical situations, you may have to set this on HIGH
  PASS to filter out everything except high frequency noise. Torpedo engines
  make noise in the high frequency range, and torpedo sonar arrays usually
  emit high frequency "pings" when actively searching for a target. Set the
  filtering device on HIGH PASS when you want to see just torpedoes on your
  map display.

  TARGETING PULSE - The targeting pulse is your active sonar. Selecting this
  directs your sonar officer to send a sonar "ping" which temporarily informs
  you of everything that's ahead of you. The problem is, it also alerts just
  abouteverything to your presence.

  TOWED ARRAY - The towed array is a long cable with a series of microphones
  along its lenght that heighten the sub's listening capabilities.
  The disadvantage of dragging towed arrays is that they oscillate at high
  speeds (creating a good deal of noise) and produce drag. For these reasons,
  towed arrays limit the sub's speed: 2/3 in the 688; 50% in the Alfa.
  Towed arrays can be over 2000 ft long. Consequently, the towed array must
  be reeled out. As you can expect, this takes a matter of minutes.
  Select TOWED ARRAY once to deploy the towed arrat. Select it again to
  retrieve it. Situations may arise in which you absolutely must accelerate
  quickly despite the fact that your towed array is deployed. In these
  situations, you will be given the choice of cutting the array's cable or
  not. Once you've cut your towed array, it's gone for the rest of the
  mission.

  TARGET - Targets a vessel. (see TARGET, above).

  5.6 Periscope:
  --------------
  (note: There is no contour imaging at the Periscope station. C on the map
  controls only returns you to periscope view. P, F and S have no functions
  at this station.)

  EXIT - Returns you to the CONN.

  ESM Level:
  ----------
  ESM stands for Electronic Sensing Measures. This gauges how strong your
  opponent's search radar is at your location. Enemy radar can detect not
  only your raised periscope, but the wake it leaves in the water. This is
  true for a raised antenna as well. The stronger the ESM signal, the faster
  you'll be detected. Always lower your periscope or antenna as soon as you
  can.

  PERISCOPE - Raises and lowers your periscope. You must be at periscope
  depth (20 ft) in order to do this. Watch the ESM level to keep your chance
  of detection low. When you raise your periscope, the map display window
  will turn into your periscope view. You can switch back and forth between
  your map display and your periscope view: select T from the map controls to
  switch to the top-down map, then select C to return to periscope view.

  PERISCOPE ROTATION - Use the arrows to rotate the periscope. The direction
  of the periscope is relative to the bow of your submarine (the bow is 000o).

  ANTENNA - Use this to raise or lower your antenna so you can communicate
  with satellites to receive mission orders and transmit messages. You must
  be at periscope depth (20 ft) in order to do this. While your antenna is
  up, watch the ESM level to keep your chances of detection low.

  TARGET - Targets a vessel (see TARGET, above).

  LAUNCH - Launches a torpedo, noisemaker or missile (whichever is currently
  selected at the Weapons Control Panel).

  5.7 Weapons Control Panel:
  --------------------------
  EXIT - Returns you to the CONN.

  Torpedo Tubes and Auxiliary Tubes:
  ----------------------------------
  The 688 is outfitted with four main torpedo tubes (at the bow) and two
  auxiliary tubes (amid ship) for noisemakers. The Alfa has six torpedo tubes
  at the bow only, but the sixth tube launches noisemakers (until you run
  out, at which point it launches torpedoes). Armed weapons aren't stored in
  the torpedo tubes, so you have to order your crew to load torpedoes. First
  select the torpedo tube you want to arm by moving the cursor to that tube.
  You must arm each tube individually. Press the activate button to highlight
  the tube's number. Press the activate button again to start the arming
  cycle (an icon of the type of torpedo in the tube will appear). When the
  weapon is ready to fire, the weapon icon will change colours. The weapons
  officer will also inform you that the torpedo is ready to launch.

  Missile Selection:
  ------------------
  Though the more recent ships of the 688 class are equipped with vertical
  launch tubes for missiles, the Los Angeles itself fires its missiles from
  its torpedo tubes. Since room aboard a submarine is limited, only a small
  number of missiles may be carried. The number and type of missiles are
  pre-selected for each mission and are listed in Chapter 3, Missions.
  Missiles are loaded and launched the same way torpedoes are. Select the
  missile box, then select it again to initiate the arming cycle. The missile
  icon will appear as long as you still have missiles on board. When the icon
  turns a darker colour, it's ready to fire. Select LAUNCH to fire the missile.
  Missile specifications begin in chapter 7.2.

  TARGET - Targets a vessel (see TARGET, above).

  LAUNCH - Launches a torpedo, noisemaker or missile (whichever is currently
  selected).

  Torpedo Control:
  ----------------
  The Torpedo Control functions let you guide torpedoes to a target or
  location or set them on an active search program. This is useful if your
  torpedo seems to have "lost" its target or in those situations where you
  don't have a firm fix on an enemy vessel that you want to try and take out.
  A launched torpedo has a guidance-wire connecting it to your sub. The
  Guidance-wire is 7.5 nm long: once it's cut, you can no longer control the
  weapon. The weapons officer will inform you when a torpedo has gone off
  course. The torpedo marker on the map will change to a darker colour. A
  torpedo with a cut guidance-wire will seek a target until it detonates or
  runs out of fuel.

  SELECT - If you've launched a torpedo and you want to control it, you must
  first press SELECT. A crosshair-cursor will appear in the viewing window.
  Use the Tab key or mouse to select the torpedo you want to control, then
  press <enter> or click a mouse button. Now select one of the following:

  SEARCH - Sets the torpedo on active search. The torpedo will run a search
  pattern and begin emmitting sonar pings to help it find a target.
  
  DIRECT - Select this and a crosshair-cursoe will appear on the map. Move
  the cursor to where you expect your target to be if it maintains its course
  and press <enter> or click a mouse button. Directing a torpedo will only
  send the torpedo to a specific location - that in itself isn't enough. When
  the torpedo's near its destination, you have to set it on SEARCH so it will
  lookfor a target. If you don't initiate a search pattern, your torpedo will
  drift until it runs out of fuel.

  DETONATE - Your own torpedo may lose its original target and end up locking
  on you or a friendly ship. In a situation like this you may decide it's
  safer to just blow it up. Make sure the torpedo is at a safe range - it
  doesn't have to actually hit something to do damage.

  Status Panel:
  -------------
  EXIT - Returns you to the CONN.
  
  SELECT - Your crew will tell you when a severe hit oe scraping the bottom
  has damaged one of the ship's systems. If you need to review the damage
  your sub has taken, press SELECT repeatedly to scroll through the status
  of each of the ship's systems. All systems will read "OK" unless you've
  sustained damage. If the system has been damaged, the status bar will tell
  you its operational condition in percentages. For example, a hard hit to
  the stern could damage the ship's engines. The status might read: "Engines
  75% operational". This would mean you couldn't go faster than 3/4 of your
  top speed. The diagram shows the sub's major systems - any major systems
  that have been damaged will be highlighted. (Note: No diagram is available
  on the Alfa.)
  Remember that a damaged system is damaged for the duration of the mission.
  In combat, your crew is too busy running the sub to repair anything. At
  any given moment, you have to make do with what you have.

  6. SUBMARINE WARFARE:
  ---------------------
  
  A submarine isn't much more than an air-bubble enclosed by one or more metal
  shells (hulls) and designed to move underwater at great depths. All
  submarines must do certain things: submerge, move forward, navigate and
  monitor their surroundings. Therefore, they share certain design features.

  Propulsion - Submarines need power sources to propel them forward and to
     provide energy for subsidiary systems such as life support, lighting,
     navigation, weapons control, the periscope, etc. internal combustion
     engines, like automobile engines, require air to burn fuel and are
     therefore unsuitable for use while underwater. two sources of power have
     proven themselves effective for submarine propulsion, and both have their
     advantages and disadvantages. Conventional submarines use electric
     batteries while underwater, but these run down with use and must be
     recharged by diesel engines. To do this, the submarine has to return to
     the surface, at which point it becomes fair game for anybody who wants
     to shoot at it (it's diesel engines make it pretty audible to enemy sonar,
     too). Despite this disadvantage, convetional submarines remain popular
     among a majority of the world's navies - they're cheap, simple to operate,
     and virtually silent when running on battery power.
     Nuclear-powered submarines use a nuclear reactor to heat water, which in
     turn drives a steam generator. They don't need to recharge batteries,
     which nicely eliminates unsavory things like range limitations and the
     need to surface. However, nuclear-powered submarines are costly and
     require greater expertise to operate. Only large navies with huge
     resources can maintain nuclear-powered submarines in their fleets.
     Nuclear-powered submarines have one disadvantage: the pumps they need to
     cool their reactors make them noisier than conventional submarines.
     however, their ability to remain submerged for literally years makes this
     a suitable risk.

  Submersion - Submarines submerge by flooding ballast tanks with seawater,
     which causes the submarine to lose buoyancy and sink. To surface,
     compresses air is blown into the ballast tanks, forcing the seawater back
     out again. Ballast tanks can be located within the pressure hull or
     between the preesure hull and the outer hull. Some submarines have
     "saddle tanks": streamlined tanks fitted to the outside of the hull.
     Diving planes (fin-like appendages located on the sides near the bow or
     on the sail) control the of the dive.

  Sensors - A submarine's most important sensors are its sonar and periscope.
     Since the periscope can only be used near the surface, the modern
     submarine must rely almost totally on sonar for its sensing. Sonar stands
     for Sound Navigation Ranging and works on the principle that all objects
     in the water produce sound waves or reflect them and are thereby subject
     to detection.

     Active sonar devices actively emit sound waves (the legendary sonar
     "ping"), which are reflected back by objects in the water. Sensitive
     receivers on board the sub pick up the reflected waves, which are then
     interpreted by sonar operators using processing devices. Active sonar
     devices are usually bow-mounted, though some submarines (such as the 688)
     also have conformal arrays that run along the sides of the sub, giving
     greater allaround sensing. Active sonar, though limited by the
     characteristic features and noises of the ocean, can give you a lot of
     critical information about the objects directly before you. the major
     drawback of active sonar is that it alerts just about everything in the
     vicinity of your presence.

     Passive sonar uses sensitive listening devices called hydrophones to pick
     up sound waves that are already moving through the water. Passive sonar
     has the advantage of not alerting everyone to your presence.
     Unfortunately, it's something more of an art than a science, requiring
     sophisticated spectrum analysers, powerful microprocessors, intuition,
     and, most importantly, time. Passive sonar capabilities can be greatly
     increased with the use of a towed array, a long, tapered cable with many
     hydrophones on it. While a towed array is helpful, it limits a submarine's
     speed and manoevreability. Towed arrays are not effective in hard turns,
     and the fact that they oscillate at high speeds (and create noise) limits
     the overall speed of the submarine.

  Submarine Classifications:
  --------------------------
  The U.S. Navy typically classifies submarines in two ways. The first is by
  the role the submarine is designed to filfitt. Traditionally, the
  submarine's strategic purpose has been to hunt and attack enemy surface
  vessels, whetever merchant or military. While this is still a primary
  function, technological innovations have given the submarine new roles.
  Refined sensors now allow submarines to hunt and attack enemy submarines.
  Finally, those submarines outfitted with longrange cruise and ballistic
  missiles can strike at land-based targets, too. The role a submarine
  performs determines what kinds of weapons it carries. Attack submarines
  such as the Los Angeles generally carry mines, cruise missiles of various
  sorts, and torpedoes. A few classes of submarines, such as the Charlie and
  Oscar classes of the Soviet Union, are primarily cruise missile plattforms.
  Ballistic missile submarines typically carry long-range ballistic missiles
  and a small number of torpedoes for defence.
  Another way to classify a submarine is by its means of propulsion.
  Submarines are typically conventional or nuclear-powered (see "Propulsion"
  above). Thus we have the following classifications:
  
  SS   Conventional attack submarine
  SSN  Nuclear-powered attack submarine
  SSB  Conventional ballistic missile submarine
  SSBN Nuclear-powered ballistic missile submarine
  SSG  Conventional guided missile submarine
  SSGN Nuclear-powered guided missile submarine

  The Ocean Enviroment:
  ---------------------

  Since the ocean doesn't allow much light in, submarines are "blind" in the
  most literal sense. Consequently, submarines rely on sound to gain
  information about the things around them. Sound waves travel through water
  at speeds roughly four times greater than they do through air. Solid objects
  in the water reflect sound waves, and a sonar operator with a good listening
  device can listen to the sound waves and determine a number of important
  things about an object that's near him: what it is, it's location and speed,
  etc.

  Water Temperature - Cold water, of course, is denser than warm water.
  Sound waves traveling from warm water into cold water will bend toward the
  bottom of the ocean (a negative gradient), while sound waves traveling from
  cold to warm will bend toward the surface (a positive gradient). The
  temperaturo of water decreases with depth, but not as gradually as you might
  expect. Instead, the ocean at any given time will be made up of several
  thermal layers. The water is normally warmest near the surface, forming a
  surface duct that can be tens to hundreds of feet deep depending on your
  location. Below the surface layer the temperature drops gradually with
  depth until it reaches another thermal layer (the thermocline). The
  temperature falls quite rapidly below the thermocline until it reaches a
  thin layer near the bottom (the permanent thermocline).

  Water Pressure - The greater the pressure, the more dense the water. Water
  pressure increases the deeper you go, so sound waves bend up with depth.

  Using the Ocean Enviroment to your Advantage - The complexity of the ocean
     enviroment and its effects on sonar can provide the submarine captain
     with numerous "hiding places" and the sonar operator with numerous
     headaches. Sound waves are typically "trapped" between thermal layers,
     forming long sound channels. A submarine trying to escape detection can
     often cross a thermal layer and stand a good chance of evading enemy
     sonar. Even within a sound channel, a submarine is not easily detected.
     Part of the effect of bending sound waves is that they tend to fall into
     a more or less single, or convergent, path. Convergent paths produce
     extensive areas where no sonar waves penetrate. These areas, called
     shadow zones, can be exploited by submarine captains - a submarine
     lurking in a shadow zone will be virtually invisible to enemy sonar.
     Here's no way to know whether you're precisely in a shadow zone or not,
     but your best bet is to hide just below the thermal layer. Tactically,
     this is a good place to be anyway: it allows you to quickly move between
     thermal layers and thus gives you an easy way of "dodging" the enemy's
     sonar.

  Evading Submarines:
  -------------------
  There's no foolproof way of evading a submarine that's pursuing you. If your
  submarine is faster, you can outrunthe othersub over the long run - however,
  this tactic gives the other sub plenty of time to call in help or, in combat,
  to fire torpedoes and destroy you (the noise you create at the top speed also
  makes you a great target). It's better to try out-manoevre the other sub.
  The first step is to do something that will make the other sub temporarily
  lose contact on you. You can do this in a number of ways. As mentioned above,
  slipping across a thermal layer gives the other sub a weaker return signal
  (the sound waves bouncing off of you will tend to stay in the thermal layer
  you're in). if you're lucky, the other sub will lose contact with you
  altogether. Another tactic is to cut your engines and drift. Chances are,
  the enemy has been tracking you by listening to your engines turn. When you
  cut your engines, his sonar operator will have to listen for something else:
  the water rushing over the outer hull, your reactor pumps, etc. In any case,
  it will take a moment for him to reestablish contact on you.
  Once you think the other sub has lost contact on you, change course. The
  more unexpected the new course will be, the better. You can turn to the side,
  turn 180o from the other sub's course and duck under him, or attempt to
  circle around and start tracking him. Combining manoevres is effective, too.
  You can cut and drift, change course, drop below a thermal layer, then
  change course again and silently speed off. Then more imaginative and
  complex the move, the better your chances of survival.

  Using Noisemakers:
  ------------------
  Noisemakers are devices you fire from your torpedo tubes that simulate the
  noise produced by your submarine. Enemy sonar - wheter submarine or
  torpedo - may be temporarily deceived into thinking that the noisemaker is
  actually your submarine.

  +---------------------+  Fig #1 shows the effective use of noisemakers
  |   |                 |  (the example demonstrates one sub evading another,
  | - O -  ....... ---> |  but the principal is the same for evading a
  |   |   . 2.     (A)  |  torpedo). Sub A is being pursued by sub B. At 1.,
  |      .              |  sub A cuts his engines and drifts. Sub B
  |      .              |  immediately loses contact with A.  2. Sub A
  |      ^              |  realeses a noisemaker to distract his pursuer. At
  |      |(A)           |  the same time, A makes a hard turn to either the
  |      |              |  right or the left (in this case, the right). Sub
  |                     |  A can now use other manoevres: he can dive below a
  |        1.           |  thermal layer, or, while he's still drifting, he
  |      ^              |  can circle around and attempt to hide in sub B's
  |      |(B)           |  baffles.
  |      |              |
  |                     |
  +---------------------+
          Fig #1

  In combat, against torpedoes or submarines, noisemakers can only help you
  survive. However, in peacetime, it may not be such a good idea to release
  noisemakers in order to evade another submarine. Since noisemakers are
  released by compressed air through torpedo or auxiliary tubes, the other
  sub has no way of knowing whether you're launching a noisemaker to evade him
  or a torpedo to kill him! He might answer your call by launching several
  torpedoes in your direction.

  Evading Torpedoes:
  ------------------
  Torpedo Limitations - There are no foolproof ways of evading torpedoes.
     Modern torpedoes are intelligent and capable of recognizing decoys and
     executing search programs. However, all torpedoes have limitations which
     a knowledgeable submarine captain can exploit. Like a submarine, a
     torpedo relies on sonar to pinpoint its target: however, the torpedo's
     relatively small size limits the area it can sense. Its cone of vision -
     the area it actually "sees" or senses - is small (perhaps only 20o wide
     directly in front of it) compared to a submarine's. If a submarine
     captain can quickly manoevre his ship out of the torpedo's narrow cone
     of vision, the torpedo will have to initiate a search program in order
     to try and find him. Torpedoes are fairly "stupid" in the sense that
     their reactions to a lost target are very mechanical. A torpedo doesn't
     have the facility to "guess" where the target went when it escaped the
     torpedo's sight. The torpedo can only initiate a preprogrammed search
     pattern, which might very well take it in the wrong direction, giving the
     submarine a chance to slip away.
     Torpedoes are also limited by the amount of fuel they can carry. This
     gives them a maximum range - a point at which they run out of fuel and
     sink to the bottom, where they self-destruct. In reality, torpedo ranges
     vary from type to type. However, in 688 Attack Sub, all torpedoes have
     a range of 10 nm. This will make it possible to outrun torpedoes in
     certain circumstances.
     Like submarines and ships, torpedoes also have a maximum Rate-of-Heading-
     Change (RHC). the RHC is nothing more than how tightly the torpedo can
     make a turn. A torpedo's RHC is pretty good in comparison to a ship's,
     but a torpedo can't turn an a dime - after all, it's swimming at speeds
     greater than 45 kts! A submarine captain can manoevre such that the
     torpedo is forced to turn in order to keep the target in view. If the
     torpedo's RHC can't compensate for the change in the target's course, the
     torpedo may "overshoot", losing the target altogther.

  Responses to a Torpedo Attack - Figure 6.3 (not included to fuckin' hard
     to paint (with ASCII gfx)) shows three evasive measure zones (A, B A and
     C), each demanding a different response on the part of the submarine
     captain. The numbers represent the approximate ranges of the torpedoes -
     notice that the range at which an evasive measure should be taken depends
     largely upon the torpedo's bearing. For example, if the torpedo's bearing
     is 000o, you'd have to take action sooner than if the torpedo were coming
     from behind. Why? Because at 000o, you and the torpedo are headed for
     each other - the gap between you and the torpedo is closing fast.
     A) At long range, you should turn and out-run the torpedo. All torpedoes
     in the game have a range of 10 nm. You only need to stay ahead of the
     torpedo for a few miles and it will run out of fuel.
     B) At medium range, turn so your sub is heading 90o away from the
     torpedo's course (choose the shortest path to get there). If you're real
     lucky, you'll escape the torpedo's narrow cone of vision, which will
     force it to initiate a search program to look for you.
     C) At short range, the best you can do is turn your so your sub is
     heading 150o or 210o away from the torpedo's course (choose the shortest
     path to get there). Hopefully you'll escape the torpedo's cone of vision
     or turn so fast that the torpedo will "overshoot", giving you time to
     make a clean get away.

  The Baffels:
  ------------
  +-----------+-----------+  Both the wake a submarine leaves as it moves
  |     B a f f l e s     |  through the water and the rotation of the screw
  |           |           |  (propellor) disrupt the transmission of sound
  |     ^     |     ^     |  directly behind the sub.
  |     |     |     |     |  The "baffles" are, in effect, the submarine's
  |           |           |  blind spot. Even a towed array, though
  |     ^     |     ^     |  diminishing the size of the baffles, does not
  |    90o    |    45o    |  completely eliminate the problem. The
  |           |           |  experienced captain stays aware of the fact that
  |  Without  |    With   |  he senses virtually nothing to a narrow area
  |Towed Array|Towed Array|  astern.
  +-----------+-----------+
           Fig #2

  7. TECHNICAL REFERENCE:
  -----------------------

  7.1 Submarines:
  ---------------
  Although you can only play a Los Angeles or Alfa, other submarine classes
  make their appearances in one or more of the missions. The following
  specifications will help you know what you're up against should you
  encounter one of these submarines. For the sake of convenience, we've
  chosen to call the Soviet subs by their USN designations, even when you're
  commanding the Alfa. Since very few players speak russian, this probably
  won't be missed much.
  Note that some of the specifications have been altered to balance game play,
  particulary the maximum depth of certain Soviet submarines.

  Akula (USSR)         Type: SSN
                       Displacement: 8,000 tons submerged
                       Lenght: 351 ft (107 m)
               Beam: 42.6 ft (13 m)
               Draught: 24.6 ft (7.5 m)
               Maximum speed: 45 kt
               Maximum depth: 1800 ft
               Noise level: Above average
               Weapons: Type 53 and Type 65 torpedoes; SS-N-16 cruise
               missiles

  Alfa (USSR)          Type: SSN
                       Displacement: 2,900 tons surfaced; 3,680 tons submeged
               Lenght: 267 ft (81.4 m)
               Beam: 31 ft (9.5 m)
               Draught: 23 ft (7 m)
               Maximum speed: 42 kt
               Maximum depth: 1800 ft
               Noise level: Above average
               Weapons: Type 53 torpedoes

  Charlie II (USSR)    Type: SSGN
                       Displacement: 4,500 tons surfaced; 5,500 tons submerged
               Lenght: 335 ft (102 m)
               Beam: 33 ft (10 m)
               Draught: 26 ft (8 m)
               Maximum speed: 24 kt
               Maximum depth: 1800 ft
               Noise level: Average
               Weapons: Type 53 torpedoes; SS-N-9 cruise missiles

  Foxtrot (USSR/Other) Type: SS
                       Displacement: 1,950 tons surfaced; 2,500 tons submerged
               Lenght: 300.1 ft (95.5 m)
               Beam: 26.2 ft (8 m)
               Draught: 20 ft (6.1 m)
               Maximum speed: 16 kt
               Maximum depth: 800 ft
               Noise level: Low
               Weapons: Type 40 and Type 53 torpedoes

  Kilo (USSR)          Type: SS
                       Displacement: 2,500 tons surfaced; 3,000 tons submerged
               Lenght: 230 ft (70 m)
               Beam: 32 ft (9.9 m)
               Draught: 21 ft (6.5 m)
               Maximum speed: 16 kt
               Maximum depth: 1200 ft
               Noise level: Very low
               Weapons: Type 53 torpedoes

  Los Angeles (US)     Type: SSN
                       Displacement: 6,080 tons surfaced; 6,927 tons submerged
               Lenght: 360 ft (109.8 m)
               Beam: 33 ft (10.1 m)
               Draught: 32 ft 4 in (9.8 m)
               Maximum speed: 37 kt
               Maximum depth: 1500 ft
               Noise level: Low
               Weapons: MK 48 ADCAP torpedoes; Harpoon and/or
               Tomahawk cruise missiles; Sea Lance A/S missiles

  Oscar (USSR)         Type: SSGN
                       Displacement: 11000 tons surfaced; 13500 tons submerged
               Lenght: 470 ft (143 m)
               Beam: 60 ft (18 m)
               Draught: 36 ft (11 m)
               Maximum speed: 35 kt
               Maximum depth: 1800 ft
               Noise level: Average
               Weapons: Type 53 and Type 65 torpedoes;
               SS-N-16 and/or SS-N-19 cruise missiles

  Trafalgar (UK)       Type: SSN
                       Displacement: 4,800 tons surfaced; 5,300 tons submerged
               Lenght: 280 ft (85.4 m)
               Beam: 33 ft (10.1 m)
               Draught: 27 ft (8.2 m)
               Maximum speed: 32 kt
               Maximum depth: 1500 ft
               Noise level: Low
               Weapons: Spearfish torpedoes; Harpoon missiles

  Typhoon (USSR)       Type: SSBN
                       Displacement: 25-30,000 tons submerged
               Lenght: 558 ft (170 m)
               Beam: 75 ft (23 m)
               Draught: 37 ft (11.5 m)
               Maximum speed: 24 kt
               Maximum depth: 1800 ft
               Noise level: Above average
               Weapons: Type 53 and Type 65 torpedoes; SA-N-5 missiles;
               SS-N-16 A/S cruise missiles

  Victor III (USSR)    Type: SSN
                       Displacement: 6,300 tons submerged
               Lenght: 348 fy (106 m)
               Beam: 33 ft (10 m)
               Draught: 23 ft (7 m)
               Maximum speed: 32 kt
               Maximum depth: 1800 ft
               Noise level: Below average
               Weapons: Type 53 and Type 65 torpedoes

  7.2 Weapons:
  ------------
  The following weapons are used in the game by or against submarines. Those
  multitude of weapons used by ships against airplanes, missiles, land targets
  or other ships are not described here since they have little impact on the
  submarine commander. Weapons flagged with a star (*) are actually used in
  the game by the 688 or Alfa. All other weapons described here appear in the
  game but are used by shipps or other subs.

  Torpedoes:
  ----------
  688 Attack Sub was designed to be a "hot" game. demanding quick responses
  and daring moves on the part of players. Real submarine combat may be
  intense, but all truth told, there's a lot of waiting for things to happen
  - courses to be plotted, contacts to be identified, missiles to fly... A
  computer game can't reproduce this aspect of naval combat and still call
  itself a game: the excitement has to be of the grab-you-by-the-shirt-collar
  variety. with this in mind, the entire game was "scaled down" so that the
  ranges at which things happen were greatly reduces. The result was that all
  torpedoes (Soviet and American) were given an artificially short range of 10
  nm.

     Mk 32 Torpedo (US/Various)
     Range: 10 nm
     Maximum speed: 40 kt
     Payload: 150 kg warhead
     This obsolete acoustic anti-submarine torpedo still finds use in many of
     the world's navies, primarily aboard escort ships.

     Mk 46 Torpedo (US)
     Range: 10 nm
     Maximum speed: 40 kt
     Payload: 44 kg warhead
     The Mk 46 is a deep-diving, high-speed ASW torpedo capable of multiple
     search patterns and re-attack. It can be launched from surface ships and
     aircraft or carried by ASROC missiles.

  *  Mk 48 ADCAP Torpedo (US)
     Range: 10 nm
     Maximum speed: 52.5 kt
     Payload: 267 kg warhead
     The Mk 48 ADCAP (advanced capabilities) program was initiated to counter
     the operational characteristics of newer Soviet subs as the Alfa. The
     result of the program was a faster and deeper-diving torpedo with better
     acoustics and electronics. The Mk 48 is launched primarily from
     submarines but can be refitted for delivery from surface ships as well.

     Mk 50 ALW Torpedo (US)
     Range: 10 nm
     Maximum speed: 40 kt
     Payload: 45 kg directed energy
     The Mk 50 Advanced Lightweight Torpedo (ALWT) is the successor to the Mk
     46 torpedo. The Mk 50 can be launched from ships, submarines and aircraft
     and is designed to meet the threat of faster and deeper-diving submarines.
     Most warheads have a large payload that blasts outward in all directions.
     The directed energy warhead uses a smaller, directed blast to "punch" a
     hole through the ship's hull. This requires even more precise delivery
     systems so that the directed blast won't glance off but will actually
     penetrate the ship's hull.

     Spearfish Torpedo (UK)
     Range: 10 nm
     Maximum speed: 60 kt
     Payload: directed energy warhead
     like the Mk 48 ADCAP, the Spearfish was developed in direct response to
     improve Soviet submarine technology (in particular the Alfa). This
     heavyweight torpedo is faster, more accurate and capable of greater depths
     than its predecessor. The Spearfish also utilizes a directed energy
     warhead (see Mk 50 above).

     Type 40 406 mm Torpedo (USSR)
     Range: 10 nm
     Maximum speed:
     Payload: 100 kg warhead
     This relatively new, lightweight torpedo is currently in use with light
     destroyers and other sub killers but may also be found aboard certain
     Soviet nuclear submarines.

   * Type 53 533 mm Torpedo (USSR)
     Range: 10 nm
     Maximum speed: 47.5 kt
     Payload: 400 kg payload
     533 mm has been the standard caliber used by the Soviet Navy and its
     allies for many years.

     Type 65 660 mm Torpedo (USSR)
     Range: 10 nm
     Maximum speed: 47.5 kt
     Payload: 900 kg warhead
     This heavyweight torpedo was only recently developed and many ships are
     currently being refitted to accommodate its larger diameter.

     Missiles:
     ---------
     ASROC Anti-Submarine System
     Range: 2 - 10 km
     Maximum speed: classified
     Payload: Mk 46 Torpedo
     The ASROC (Anti-Submarine Rocket) is the principal ASW weapon of the U.S.
     Navy and is popular with over ten other contries. Carried primarily by
     destroyers but also by cruisers and frigates, the ASROC consists of a
     ballistic rocket carrying an Mk 46 torpedo. The rocket drops the torpedo
     by parachute at a pre-determined point near the target. Once underwater,
     the torpedo homes in on the target. By quickly placing a torpedo in the
     vicinity of the target, the ASROC reduces the submarine's reaction time
     to the attack, increasing the likelihood of scoring a hit.

   * Harpon Submarine-Launched Cruise Missile (US)
     Range: 130 km (70 nm)
     Maximum speed: 0.9 Mach
     Payload: 570 lb HE warhead
     Must be at periscope depth and have a t-fix to launch this weapon.

   * Tomahawk Submarine-Launched Cruise Missile (US)
     Range: 460 km (anti-ship); 2600 km (land mark)
     Maximum speed: 475 kt
     Payload: 1000 lb HE warhead
     Must be at periscope depth and have a t-fix to launch this weapon.

     SS-N-14 Anti-Submarine Weapon (USSR)
     Range: 55 km
     Maximum speed: Mach .94 at 750 m above sea level
     Payload: Nuclear warhead or homing torpedo
     The SS-N-14 (Silex) is a ship-launched A/S missile believed to carry a
     homing torpedo or low-level nuclear warhead to its target.

   * Sea Lance ASW Stand-Off Weapon
     Range: Classified
     Maximum speed: Classified
     Payload: Classified
     The Sea Lance was designed to replace the aging SUBROC anti-submarine
     missile and give American attack submarines an edge over Soviet subs by
     extending their range of attack beyond normal torpedo range. The missile
     is launched from a submerged submarine. As it clears the surface, a rocket
     motor is ignited which carries the payload (a torpedo) to the target. As
     the missile re-enter the water, the homing device on the torpedo activates
     and begins searching for a target. Exact figures for the Sea Lance are
     currently not available. Testing has been scheduled for July 1989.

  Ships:
  ------
  As a submarine commander, you need to know as much about your targets as
  you do about your own submarine. A ship's noise level will give you an idea
  of how easily it can be tracked, while its type, size and maximum speed will
  tell you how easily it can evade your attack. The kinds of weapons a ship
  carries are also important - they determine what the ship can do to your
  torpedoes and missiles as well as your submarine. Armed ships generally rely
  on a three-point system of defence against incoming missiles and torpedoes.
  Surface-to-air missiles (SAM's) and anti-torpedo missiles are the first line
  of defence, typically being employed against long range targets.
  If missile defence is unsuccessful, guns will be used. Phalanx and chaff make
  up the last line of defence. Ships will attempt to protect each other as well
  as themselves, firing at missiles and torpedoes destined for other ships.
  Keep this in mind when setting up attacks on convoys and battle groups -
  take out warships first.
  Be wary around any ships carrying depth charges, depth bombs, and anti-
  submarine (A/S) torpedoes or missiles (ASROC and SS-N-14's). The latter
  are particularly dangerous because of their long-range.

  Cargo Ships (Various)
  Displacement: Varied
  Lenght: Varied
  Beam: Varied
  Draught: Varied
  Maximum speed: 20 kt
  Noise level: Very high

  Forrest Sherman Class
  Type: DD
  Displacement: 2,800 - 3,000 tons average
  Lenght: 418 ft (127.4 m)
  Beam: 45 ft (13.7 m)
  Draught: 23 ft (7 m)
  Maximum speed: 20 kt
  Noise level: High
  Weapons: Not applicable in mission

  Iowa Class
  Type: BB
  Displacement: 45,000 ton average
  Lenght: 887.2 ft (270.4 m)
  Beam: 108.2 ft (33 m)
  Draught: 38 ft (11.6 m)
  Maximum speed: 35 kt
  Noise level: High
  Guns: Nine 16 in/50 guns;twelve 5 in/38 guns; four MK 15 20 mm CIWS Phalanx
  SLCM's: Tomahawk cruise missiles, eight quad launchers
  SSM's: Harpoon missiles

  Kara Class
  Type: CG
  Displacement: 9,700 tons
  Lenght: 568 ft (173.2 m)
  Beam: 61 ft (18.6)
  Draught: 22 ft (6.7 m)
  Maximum speed: 34 kt
  Noise level: Above average
  A/S Missiles: SS-N-14 missiles, two quad launchers
  Depth Bombs: Anti-submarine/anti-torpedo depth bombs, two RBU 6000
  12-barrelled trainable launchers
  Guns: Four 76 mm/59 guns; four 30 mm Gatling guns
  SAM's: SA-N-6 missiles, six launchers; SA-N-4 missiles, two twin launchers;
  SA-N-3 missiles, one twin launcher

  Kidd Class
  Type: DDG
  Displacement: 8,300 full load
  Lenght: 563 ft (171.6 m)
  Beam: 55 ft (16.8 m)
  Draught: 30 ft (9.1 m)
  Maximum speed: 33 kt
  Noise level: Above average
  A/S Missiles: ASROC missiles
  Guns: Two MK 16 20 mm CIWS 6-barrelled Phalanx
  SAM's: SM-1 ER missiles
  SSM's: Harpoon missiles, two quad launchers

  Kirov Class
  Type: BC
  Displacement: 22,000 tons average
  Lenght: 813.6 ft (247.99 m)
  Beam: 93.5 ft (28.5 m)
  Draught: 29.5 ft (9.1 m)
  Maximum speed: 33 kt
  Noise level: High
  Aircraft: Three Hormone helicopters
  A/S Missiles: SS-N-14 missiles, one quad launcher
  A/S Torpedoes: type 53 torpedoes, ten torpedo tubes
  Depth Bombs: Anti-submarine/anti-torpedo depth bombs, one RBU 6000
  12-barrelled trainable launcher, two RBU 1000 six-barrelled launchers
  Guns: two 100 mm guns; eight 30 mm Gateling guns
  SAM's: SA-N-6 missiles, twelve launchers; SA-N-4 missiles, two twin
  launchers
  SSM's: SS-N-19 missiles

  Koni Class
  Type: FF
  Displacement: 1,900 tons full load
  Lenght: 311.6 ft (95 m)
  Beam: 42 ft (12.8 m)
  Draught: 13.7 ft (4.2 m)
  Maximum speed: 29 kt
  Noise level: Average
  A/S Torpedoes: Type 40 torpedoes, four torpedo tubes
  Depth Bombs: A/S depth bombs, two 12-barrelled RBU-6000 trainable launchers
  Depth Charges: Depth charges, two DC racks
  Guns: Four 76 mm twin guns; four 30 mm twin guns
  SAM's: SA-N-4 missiles, one twin launcher
  SSM's: SS-N-2C missiles

  Krivak II Class
  Type: FFG
  Displacement: 3,900 tons full load
  Lenght: 405.2 ft (123.5 m)
  Beam: 45.9 ft (14 m)
  Draught: 16.4 ft (5 m)
  Maximum speed: 32 kt
  Noise level: Above average
  A/S Missiles: SS-N-14 Missiles, one quad launcher
  A/S Torpedoes: Type 53 torpedoes, two quad launchers
  Depth Bombs: Anti-submarine/anti-torpedo depth bombs, two RBU-6000
  12-barrelled trainable launchers
  Guns: Two 100 mm twin guns
  Mines: Capacity for twenty
  SAM's: SA-N-4 missiles, four twin launchers

  Merchant Ships (Various)
  Displacement: Varied
  Lenght: Varied
  Beam: Varied
  Draught: Varied
  Maximum speed: 20 kt
  Noise level: High

  Nimitz Class
  Type: CVN
  Displacement: 81,600 tons average
  Lenght: 1,092 ft (332.9 m)
  Beam: 134 ft (40.8 m)
  Draught: 37 ft (11.3 m)
  Maximum speed: 33 kt
  Noise level: High
  Aircraft: 85-90
  Guns: four MK 16 20 mm CIWS six-barrelled Phalanx
  SAm's: Sea Sparrow missiles

  Oliver Hazard Perry Class
  Type: FFG
  Displacement: 3,585 tons
  Lenght: 445 ft (135.6 m)
  Beam: 45 ft (13.7 m)
  Draught: 24.5 ft (7.5 m)
  Maximum speed: 29 kt
  Noise level: Above average
  Aircraft: two LAMPS III helicopters
  A/S Torpedoes: Mk 32 A/S torpedoes, two triple torpedo tubes
  Guns: one 76 mm/62 Mk 75 gun; one 20 mm CIWS MK 17 six-barrelled Phalanx
  SAM's: SM-1 ER Missiles, one MK 13 dual purpose launcher
  SSM's: Harpoon missiles

  Sacramento Class
  Type: AOE
  Displacement: 51,400 - 53,600 full load
  Lenght: 793 ft (241.7 m)
  Beam: 107 ft (32.6 m)
  Draught: 39.3 ft (12 m)
  Maximum speed: 26 kt
  Noise level: High
  Guns: Two MK 16 20 mm CIWS six-barrelled Phalanx
  SAM's: Sea Sparrow missiles, one MK 29 system
  Countermeasures: One MK 36 Super RBOC chaffroc

  Slava Class
  Type: CG
  Displacement: 12,500 tons full load
  Lenght: 613.4 ft (186.9 m)
  Beam: 65.6 ft (19.99 m)
  Draught: 
  Maximum speed: 12 kt
  Noise level: Above average
  Aircraft: One Hormone helicopter
  A/S Torpedoes: type 53 torpedoes, eight torpedo tubes
  Depth Bombs: Anti-submarine/anti-torpedo depth bombs, two RBU-6000
  12-barrelled trainable launchers
  Depth Charges: depth charges, two racks
  Guns: two 130 mm twin guns; 6 30 mm Gatling guns
  SAM's: SA-N-6 missiles, eight launchers; SS-N-4 missiles, one twin launcher
  SSM's: SS-N-12 missiles

  Tankers (Various)
  Displacement: Varied
  Lenght: Varied
  Beam: Varied
  Draught: Varied
  Maximum speed: 16 kt
  Noise level: Very high
  Weapons: None

  7.4 Aircraft:
  -------------

  Lockhead P3C Orion Airplane
  Maximum speed: 415 kt
  Mission Endurance: 16 hr
  This four-engined, land-based plane has served the U.S. Navy well as an ASW
  patrol aircraft. With its onboard radar, forward-looking infra-red, MAD
  equipment and sonobuoys, the PC3 Orion is used to detect, track and, if
  necessary, destroy enemy submarines.

  Sikorsky SH-60B Seahawk Helicopter
  Maximum speed: 126 kt
  Mission Endurance: 3 1/2 hr
  Carried by a variety of cursiers, destroyers, frigates and special helicopter-
  carriers, the Seahawk acts as the forward sensors of the ship-based LAMPS III
  ASW system. With its search radar, towed MAD system, sonobuoys and dipping
  sonar, the helicopter provides raw data, which is then processed onboard the
  parent-ship. The Seahawk also carries two Mk 46 lightweight torpedoes, making
  it a serious threat to enemy submarines.

  7.5 GLOSSARY:
  -------------

  AOE          Fast combat support ship
  A/S          Anti-submarine weapon
  ASROC        Anti-submarine rocket
  ASW          Anti-submarine Warfare
  Baffles      Turbulent water caused by the wake of a submarine and the turning
               of its screw. Because turbulence negatively affects sonar
               transmissions, submarines are "blind" to a narrow area directly
           behind them.
  BB           Battleship
  BC           Battle Cruiser
  Beam         The extreme widht of a ship's hull
  Bearing      The direction of a target in realtion to your sub (the nose of
               your sub = 000o)
  BF           Baltijskij Flot (Russian for Baltic Fleet)
  Boomer       Slang term for SSBN's
  Bow          Forward end of the ship
  Cavitation   Partial vacuums forming around the blades of the propellor due
               to fast acceleration and/or shallow waters. Cavitation is
            extremely noisy.
  CG           Guided missile cruiser
  Chaff        Strips of metal foil shot into the air to distract incoming
               missiles. Used by surface ships as a last ditch defence.
  CHG          Light aircraft carrier
  CINC         Commander-In-Chief
  CMF          Chernoe Mokoj Flot (Russian for Black Sea Fleet)
  CONN         Conning Tower; the elevated platform above the deck used on early
               submarines for attack direction and navigation. Today it refers
               to the control room where these functions are now performed.
  Course       The direction you're pointing in relation to the compass
               (North = 000o)
  CVN          Multi-purpose aircraft carrier (nuclear-powered)
  DD           Destroyer
  DDG          Guided missile destroyer
  ESM          Electronic Sensing Measures
  FF           Frigate
  FFG          Guided missile frigate
  Glavnyi      Short for Glavnokomanduyushchij (Russian for Commander-in-Chief)
  HUD          Heads-up-Display; a monitoring system that projects compass and
               depth readings onto the Map Display Window
  Hydrophones  Microphones along the hull of a submarine that transmit sound
               waves to a sonar operator
  LANTFLT      Atlantic Fleet
  MAD          Magnetic Anomaly Detector
  MEDFLT       Mediterranean Fleet
  NATO         North Atlantic Treaty Organization
  PACFLT       Pacific Fleet
  PLA          Podvodnaya Lodka Atomnaya (Soviet designation for SSN's)
  PLARB        Podvodnaya Lodka Atomnaya Raketnaya Krylataya (Soviet
               designation for SSBN's)
  Port         Left
  RBOC         Rapid Bloom Off-board Countermeasures; a countermeasure
               system for surface ships used against incoming missiles. The
               RBOC system consists of a number of mortars firing chaff
               cartriges.
  SAM          Surafce-to-Air Missile
  Screw        Propeelor
  SF           Severnyj Flot (Russian for Northern fleet)
  SLBM         Submarine-Launched Ballistic Missile
  SLCM         Sunmarine-Launched Cruise Missile
  Sonar        Sound Navigation Ranging; a device that detects the presence
               and location of underwater objects by sending out sound waves
               and monitoring their echo.
  SS           Conventional attack submarine
  SSB          Conventional ballistic submarine
  SSBN         Nuclear-powered ballistic missile submarine
  SSG          Conventional guided missile submarine
  SSGN         Nuclear-powered guided missile submarine
  SSN          Nuclear-powered attack submarine
  Starboard    Right
  Stern        Back of the ship
  TOF          Tikhij Okeanskij Flot (Russian for Pacific Fleet)
  Towed Array  A long cable with microphones that enhances a surface ship or
               submarine's passive sonar capabilities.
  Waypoint     A destination for your sub that your auto-pilot will head for
               when active.

  8. The Security Access Codes:
  -----------------------------
  ALBANY:
  There are 10 different missions... The challange of the earlier missions...
  
  ALBUQUERQUE:
  You can choose to command... A note on playing by modem: You can choose
  to play by the mission objectives...

  ASHEVILLE:
  Your superiors are going to look over your shoulder... Navy helicopters
  will be attempting to locate your sub...

  ATLANTA:
  American and Soviet naval forces... the experience the crews gain...

  AUGUSTA:
  Prove that American high-tech equipment... Try and stay in the baffles...

  BALTIMORE:
  The White House is blaming the Libyans... The tankers are under the
  protection...

  BATON ROUGE:
  Your crew is fatigued from month-long operations... The Navy wants you to
  make a lasting impression...

  BIRMINGHAM:
  Under new leadership, Yugoslavia attempts to reform... Your job is to get
  six cargo ships...

  BOSTON:
  A Soviet SSBN has reportedly left... Your main objectives is to destroy
  the SSBN...

  BREMERTON:
  NATO is sending a large battle group to the Norwegian Sea... If NATO can
  keep the Soviet Northern fleet...

  BUFFALO:
  As in two previous world wars, American shipping forms convoys... Your
  688 is assigned to counter any naval assaults...

  CHICAGO:
  The next step is to destroy inland targets... with your periscope still
  raised, select TARGET.

  CINCINNATI:
  You can choose play levels only... Medom games are automatically set...

  CITY OF CORPUS CHRISTI:
  In both instances, one player will have to be designated... the orginator
  sets up the game and initiates the call...

  DALLAS:
  You have a choice of letting your computer answer... If you're going to
  let the computer answer...

  GROTON:
  When you've played all the modem games... If you don't, the computer will
  still maintain contact...

  HELENA:
  If it does, you may be getting phone calls... You can temporarily stop...

  HONOLULU:
  With your computers off, connect the two computers... Turn on the computers,
  load the game...

  HOUSTON:
  As an attack boat, your primary role... Since in a submarine you can't
  actually see anything around you...

  HYMAN G. RICKOVER:
  The top-down map gives you aerial perspectives... Your submarine is the
  fixed point...

  INDIANAPOLIS:
  The darker the shade... Always stay aware of the average depth...

  JACKSONVILLE:
  This is useful when travelling.. The beam's high frequency and short range...

  KEY WEST:
  The white triangle in the middle of the line is your sub's current course...
  The vertcal gauge...

  LA JOLLA:
  Some may have been identified... The things the sonar operator is trying to
  determine...

  LOS ANGELES:
  It is important to understand... In determining a ship's course, the
  northern point...

  LOUISVILLE:
  On the information bar at the base... Mission time runs twice as fast...

  MEMPHIS:
  If the messages from the crew are rolling by... It will appear in the
  message bar...

  MIAMI:
  When you are playing by modem, you can use TRANSMIT.. For this you can be
  at any depth and you don't need to use your antenna...

  MINNEAPOLISSAINT PAUL:
  The closer the dots are to each other.. All tracks will be black...

  NEW YORK CITY:
  Selecting waypoints activates the auto-pilot, which will steer your sub...
  It will adjust the speed down to make turns...

  NEWPORT NEWS:
  The auto-pilot will only function if you have set at least one waypoint...
  Changing the rudder will automatically turn off the auto-pilot...

  NORFOLK:
  Cavitation results from partical vacuums... Since the bubbles produced
  by cavitation are very noisy...

  OKLAHOMA CITY:
  Lowering the handle realeses air from the ballast tanks, filling the tanks...
  Raising the handles realeses compressed air...

  OLYMPIA:
  The numbers represent fractions or percentages of your total power output...
  Use FLANK speed to accelerate quickly, but remember that higher speeds have
  their penalties...

  OMAHA:
  The control is incremented, which means you can control the rate at which
  you change course... Remember that activating the rudder..

  PASADENA:
  Use the frequency analyzer to display the sound signature... Different
  objects will peak in different parts of the spectrum...

  PHILADELPHIA:
  Selecting this directs your sonar officer... The problem is, it also alerts
  just about everything...

  PHOENIX:
  Consequently, the towed array must be reeled out... Situations mat arise in
  which you absolutely must accelerate...

  PITTSBURGH:
  This gauges how strong your opponent's search radar... Enemy radar can
  detect not only your raised periscope but the wake...

  PROVIDENCE:
  Since the room aboard a submarine... The number and type of missiles are
  preselected for each mission...

  SAN FRANCISO:
  The torpedo control function... This is useful if our torpedo seems to
  have lost its target...

  SAN JUAN:
  A launched torpedo has a guidance-wire... A torpedo with a cut guidance-
  wire will seek a target until it detonates...

  SALT LAKE CITY:
  If you've launched a torpedo and want to control it...

  SCRANTON:
  Your own torpedo may lose its orginal target and end up locking on you...

  TOPEKA:
  All systems will read "OK" unless you've sustanied damage...

  9. KEYBOARD COMMANDS:
  ---------------------

  Cursor Keys:
  
  Tab          Tab through control groups
  Left arrow   Move left between positions within a control group
  Right arrow  Move right between positions within a control group
  Up arrow     Move left between controls regardless of groups
  Down arrow   Move right between controls regardless of groups

  Quick Keys:

  F2           Radio Room
  F3           Status Panel
  F4           Ship's Control
  F5           Periscope
  F6           Navigation Board
  F7           Weapon Control
  F8           Sonar Room
  F9           CONN
  O or X       Exit
  <Ctrl>R      Pseudo-Cyrilic On/Off

  Ship's Control Panel          Navigaton Board

  R   Rudder control            G   Target
  E   Engine control            W   Set Waypoint
  D   Dive Plane Control        K   Clear Waypoint
  .   Auto Pilot                Q   Time Compression
  5   Auto Function             .   Auto Pilot
  1   Display Controls          4   Plotting controls

  Weapon Control Panel:         Periscope:

  G   Target                    G   Target
  R   Torpedo Tubes             U   Periscope Up/Down
  A   Auxiliary missiles        N   Antenna Up/Down
  M   Missile Tubes - 688       L   Launch
  2   Torpedo Control           -   Periscope Left
  3   Torpedo Control - Alfa    =   Periscope Right
  1   Display Control           1   Display Control

  Sonar Room:                   Radio Room:

  G   Target                    A   Antenna Up/Down
  3   Analyse                   P   Persicope Up/Down
  2   Sonar Controls - 688      S   Send Code
  3   Sonar Controls - Alfa     T   Transmit
  1   Display Control           2   Message Review

  Status Panel:

  S   Status

  Map Keys:

  P   Look to port in contour mode *          H   HUD On/Off
  F   Look forward in contour mode *          B   Bottoms contours On/
  S   Look to starboard in contour mode *         Off
  I   Zoom in on top-down map                 T   Top-down map On/
  O   Zoom out on top-down map                    Off
  C   Contour Imaging Display On/Off
  *   Not available on Alfa

******************************************************************************

                                CALL:
    4800 ->                                                  24 H / DAY
   14400 BPS               __       __        __            310 MB ONLINE
                 /\        \ \      \ \       \ \   /\
                / /     _   \ \  _  _\ \   _   \ \ / /__
               / / __  | |  / / | ||_  /  | |  / / \___ \
              / /__\ \ | |_/ /  | |  \ \  | |_/ /  ___/ /
              \______/ |____/   |_|   \_\ |____/  |____/ 
               __         __               ___      ______      
    ______     \ \        \ \     /\      /__ \    / ____ \      ______  
    \_____|     \ \    _  _\ \   / /      ___\ \  / /  _ \ \    |_____/  
       \___|     \ \  | ||_  /  / /_     |  _\\ \ \ \ | | \ \  |___/     
         \_| _____\ \ | |  \ \  \  /___  | |   \ \ \ \| | / /  |_/       
            |_______/ |_|   \_\  \_____| |_|   / /  \/|_|/ /             
                                                           -+ CYDRIC +-  
                          Sysop : Snuskbuske / H2O
                        CoSysop : Cydric / Byterapers
 
                                 +46-8-363425

             This is H2O & Dual Crew's WHQ !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

